dictionaries/nl/index.aff
FLAG long
# auto=>autootje
SFX Ye Y 15
SFX Ye 0 atje a				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 utje u				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 otje o				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 etje i				ts:NN1r
SFX Ye é eetje é			ts:NN1r
SFX Ye 0 atjes/CaCbCp a			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 atjes-/CaCbCp a		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 utjes/CaCbCp u			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 utjes-/CaCbCp u		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 otjes/CaCbCp o			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 otjes-/CaCbCp o		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 etjes/CaCbCp i			ts:NN2r
SFX Ye 0 etjes-/CaCbCp i		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye é eetjes/CaCbCp é		ts:NN2r
SFX Ye é eetjes-/CaCbCp é		ts:NN2r

# bal=>balletje
SFX Yf Y 27
SFX Yf 0 betje b			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 getje g			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 ketje k			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 letje l			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 metje m			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 netje n			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 petje p			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 retje r			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 setje s			ts:NN1r
SFX Yf 0 betjes/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 getjes/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 ketjes/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 letjes/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 metjes/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 netjes/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 petjes/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 retjes/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 setjes/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 betjes-/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 getjes-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 ketjes-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 letjes-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 metjes-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 netjes-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 petjes-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 retjes-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2r
SFX Yf 0 setjes-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2r

# AOW=>AOW'tje
SFX Yg Y 2
SFX Yg 0 'tje .				ts:NN1r
SFX Yg 0 'tjes .			ts:NN2r

# FLAGS FOR PLURALS (COMPOUNDING END)
# team=>teams
SFX Za Y 1
SFX Za 0 s .				ts:NN2

# ium => iums, ia, icus->ici
SFX Zu Y 4
SFX Zu 0 s ium
SFX Zu ium ia ium				ts:NN2
SFX Zu icus ici icus			ts:NN2
SFX Zu icus ica icus			ts:NN2

# museum => musea, catalogus -> catalogi
SFX Zx Y 2
SFX Zx um a um				ts:NN2
SFX Zx us i us				ts:NN2

# tuin=>tuinen
SFX Zb Y 4
SFX Zb 0 en/CaCbCp [^eo]		ts:NN2
SFX Zb 0 ën/CaCbCp [eo]			ts:NN2
SFX Zb 0 en-/CaCbCp [^eo]		ts:NN2
SFX Zb 0 ën-/CaCbCp [eo]		ts:NN2

# auto=>auto's, cd => cd's
SFX Zc Y 1
SFX Zc 0 's .				ts:NN2

# schoonheid=>schoonheden
SFX Zd Y 2
SFX Zd heid heden/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2
SFX Zd heid heden-/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2

# tas=>tassen
SFX Ze Y 26
SFX Ze 0 ben/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 den/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 fen/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 gen/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ken/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 len/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 men/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 nen/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 pen/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 sen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ren/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ten/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 zen/CaCbCp z		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ben-/CaCbCp b		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 den-/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 fen-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 gen-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ken-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 len-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 men-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 nen-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 pen-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 sen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ren-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 ten-/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Ze 0 zen-/CaCbCp z		ts:NN2

# baal=>balen, kloof=>kloven
SFX Zf Y 88
SFX Zf al len/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ar ren/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf an nen/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ad den/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ak ken/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ap pen/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf as zen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf af ven/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf am men/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf at ten/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ag gen/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf el len/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf er ren/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf en nen/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ed den/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ek ken/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ep pen/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf es zen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ef ven/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf em men/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf et ten/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf eg gen/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ol len/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf or ren/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf on nen/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf od den/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ok ken/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf op pen/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf os zen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf of ven/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf om men/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ot ten/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf og gen/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ul len/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ur ren/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf un nen/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ud den/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf uk ken/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf up pen/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf us zen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf uf ven/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf um men/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ut ten/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ug gen/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf al len-/CaCbCd l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ar ren-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf an nen-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ad den-/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ak ken-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ap pen-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf as zen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf af ven-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf am men-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf at ten-/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ag gen-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf el len-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf er ren-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf en nen-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ed den-/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ek ken-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ep pen-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf es zen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ef ven-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf em men-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf et ten-/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf eg gen-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ol len-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf or ren-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf on nen-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf od den-/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ok ken-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf op pen-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf os zen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf of ven-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf om men-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ot ten-/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf og gen-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ul len-/CaCbCp l		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ur ren-/CaCbCp r		ts:NN2
SFX Zf un nen-/CaCbCp n		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ud den-/CaCbCp d		ts:NN2
SFX Zf uk ken-/CaCbCp k		ts:NN2
SFX Zf up pen-/CaCbCp p		ts:NN2
SFX Zf us zen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zf uf ven-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zf um men-/CaCbCp m		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ut ten-/CaCbCp t		ts:NN2
SFX Zf ug gen-/CaCbCp g		ts:NN2

# paragraaf => paragrafen, filosoof => filosofen, diocees => diocesen
SFX Zg Y 3
SFX Zg af fen/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2
SFX Zg of fen/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2
SFX Zg es sen/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2

#lens=>lenzen
SFX Zh Y 4
SFX Zh s zen/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zh f ven/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2
SFX Zh s zen-/CaCbCp s		ts:NN2
SFX Zh f ven-/CaCbCp f		ts:NN2

# legende=>legenden (non-compounding)
SFX Zi Y 1
SFX Zi 0 n .		ts:NN2

# dode=>doden (compounding)
SFX Zj Y 2
SFX Zj 0 n/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2
SFX Zj 0 n-/CaCbCp .		ts:NN2

# FLAGS FOR POSSESSIVE FORM OF PROPER NAMES
SFX PN N 13
SFX PN 0 ' [hsxz]		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's [^a][a]		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 s [a]a			ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's [^aeou][i]		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's [^o][o]		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's [^aeou][u]		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 s [bcdefghjklmnpqrtuüvwxzéëâïóçà]	ts:DT
SFX PN 0 s [oe]y		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's [^eo]y		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 s [aeuo]i		ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's [bcdeéfghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]a	ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's che					ts:DT
SFX PN 0 's dge					ts:DT

# FLAG for female inhabitant of place (Alphen=>Alphense)
SFX PI N 1
SFX PI 0 se .		ts:NN1d	ts:AJe

# FLAG for male inhabitant of place (Eindhoven=>Eindhovenaar)
SFX PJ N 2
SFX PJ 0 aar en		ts:NN1d
SFX PJ 0 mer m		ts:NN1d

# FLAG for male inhabitant of place (Hoofddorp->Hoofddorper, Haarlemmermeer->Haarlemmermeerder)
SFX PK N 4
SFX PK 0 er [^r]	ts:NN1d
SFX PK 0 der r		ts:NN1d
SFX PK 0 ers [^r]	ts:NN2d
SFX PK 0 ders r	ts:NN2d

# FLAG for noun from adjective (deskundig => deskundige, deskundigen)
SFX Zk Y 2
SFX Zk 0 en .		ts:NN2
SFX Zk 0 e .			ts:NN1

# FLAG for noun from adjective (deskundig => deskundigheid, deskundigheden)
SFX Zm Y 2
SFX Zm 0 heid .		ts:NN1
SFX Zm 0 heden .		ts:NN2

# FLAG for female form of noun (bassist => bassiste)
SFX Xe Y 1
SFX Xe 0 e .			ts:NN1

# FLAGS FOR VERBS

# flags for more or less common prefixes in verbs
PFX Pa Y 1
PFX Pa 0 aaneen .
PFX Pb Y 1
PFX Pb 0 aan .
PFX Pc Y 1
PFX Pc 0 achtereen .
PFX Pd Y 1
PFX Pd 0 achter .
PFX Pe Y 1
PFX Pe 0 achterna .
PFX Pf Y 1
PFX Pf 0 achterop .
PFX Pg Y 1
PFX Pg 0 achterover .
PFX Ph Y 1
PFX Ph 0 achteruit .
PFX Pi Y 1
PFX Pi 0 achterom .
PFX Pj Y 1
PFX Pj 0 af .
PFX Pk Y 1
PFX Pk 0 uiteen .
PFX Pl Y 1
PFX Pl 0 bĳ .
PFX Pm Y 1
PFX Pm 0 over .
PFX Pn Y 1
PFX Pn 0 voor .
PFX Po Y 1
PFX Po 0 binnen .
